Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-286
Public lands; entry as townsite; deeds; to whom made.

When a townsite is entered under the Act of Congress mentioned in section 76-285, deeds shall be made by the proper corporate officers or by the county judge and their successors in office to the inhabitants of such townsite, according to their respective rights or to the purchasers of lots.

Laws 1907, c. 155, § 2, p. 487;

R.S.1913, § 6285;

C.S.1922, § 5804;

C.S.1929, § 76-805;

R.S.1943, § 76-286.